Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 4

Assessments and Damages

7-84-401. Special assessments.

The municipality is hereby authorized to levy special assessments against all properties, except those exempt from taxation, located within the central business improvement district to cover all costs and expenses of each and every improvement constructed, erected, or purchased and placed within such district, including all necessary incidental expenses. Such expenses may include all costs of construction, costs of making estimates and plans, feasibility studies, charges of engineers and attorneys, compensation of the members of the board of assessment commissioners, surveying, planning surveys, printing, advertising for bids, preparation of the assessment rolls, inspection and administrative expenses, abstracts and other title costs, construction interest, bond interest, necessary reserves, commissions paid to brokers or agents in connection with the sale of bonds issued by the municipality, and provision for additional costs or losses of assessment revenue for the development and construction of such improvements as are authorized by the municipal ordinance not contemplated at the time of the hearings on the organization of the central business improvement district. The assessment authorized in this section shall include all such costs, even though some of the construction, engineering, inspection, and administrative or other services necessary are performed by the municipality.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 15; T.C.A., § 6-3915.

Cross-References. Alternative method of establishing and governing district, §7-84-506.

Apportionment and assessment to be made only after all work is completed and costs are determined, §§7-84-402,7-84-420.

Special assessment of municipal property not otherwise assessed, §7-84-406.

7-84-402. Apportionment of costs to property affected.

Prior to the acquisition of an improvement or commencement of the construction of an improvement described in the ordinance organizing the central business improvement district or upon completion of the improvements, at the discretion of the board of assessment commissioners, the board of assessment commissioners shall apportion the totality of all costs of such improvement district upon the various properties located within the district in accordance with the benefits to each property upon the completion of the work by such improvements conferred. If the board of assessment commissioners determines that certain improvements benefit only certain properties within a district, the board may apportion the costs of the improvements upon the various properties that benefit from the improvements.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 16; T.C.A., § 6-3916; Acts 2007, ch. 494, §§ 9, 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 14 provided that the act shall apply to central business improvement districts already in existence and any districts that hereinafter may be created.

Cross-References. Assessment to be made only after all work is completed and costs are determined, §7-84-420.

7-84-403. Maximum assessment — Payments by municipality.

Except as provided in subsection (b), the aggregate amount of the levy or assessment made against any lot or parcel of land shall not exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the assessed value of the lot and improvement on the lot. The municipality shall pay any part of the levy or assessment against any such lot or parcel of land as may be in excess of fifteen percent (15%) of the assessed value.

In any tourist resort county, as defined in § 42-1-301, the aggregate amount of the levy or assessment made against a lot or parcel of land shall not exceed the cost of the improvements that are apportioned pursuant to § 7-84-404 to that lot or parcel.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 17; T.C.A., § 6-3917; Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 14 provided that the act shall apply to central business improvement districts already in existence and any districts that hereinafter may be created.

7-84-404. Determination of benefit to property — Apportionment of costs in relation to assessed valuation authorized.

In determining the benefits to each lot or parcel of property within the central business improvement district, the board of assessment commissioners may consider frontage, area, the proportion that the assessed value of each lot or parcel bears to the whole assessed value of all properties within the district, or a combination of all of these. All assessments made by the board shall be presumed to have been made on the basis of the benefit conferred on each lot or parcel of property within the district, and shall be subject to review only as provided in this chapter.

The fact that assessments may be spread uniformly over a large area within the district shall not be conclusive that such assessment was arbitrarily made or that the board made no attempt to distribute the costs of the improvements in proportion to the benefits received.

The ordinance provided for in § 7-84-208 may contain a finding that the special benefit to all properties located within the central business improvement district is uniformly commensurate with the assessed value of each property in such district, in which event the determination provided for in § 7-84-303(b)(1) shall not be necessary, and the total costs of such improvements to be assessed against the owners of property in such district shall be assessed against each property in the same proportion that the assessed value of each such property bears to the assessed value of all such properties within the district.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 18; T.C.A., § 6-3918.

7-84-405. Assessment of municipally-owned property authorized.

The governing body of the municipality shall determine whether municipally-owned property located within the district shall be assessed in the same manner as private property, and, if it does so determine, shall provide for such assessments in the ordinance creating the central business improvement district as authorized in §7-84-208(5).

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 19; T.C.A., § 6-3919.

7-84-406. Special assessment of municipal property not otherwise assessed.

Municipal properties that are not assessed for taxation by the municipality or the county in which the municipality is located, and that are to be assessed for the purposes of this chapter, as provided in §7-84-405, shall be specially assessed by the municipal assessor, or the county assessor, if the municipality uses county property assessments, upon the request of the board of assessment commissioners, and the cost for making such assessments shall be borne by the central business improvement district.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 20; T.C.A., § 6-3920.

Cross-References. Special assessments, §7-84-401.

7-84-407. Assessment roll.

After all assessments have been determined by the board of assessment commissioners, the board shall prepare an assessment roll, which shall show the location of the property, the owner of the property as shown in the records of the municipal or county assessor, and the amount of the assessment.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 21; T.C.A., § 6-3921.

7-84-408. Schedule of property taken or damaged.

The board of assessment commissioners shall also prepare a schedule of all property proposed to be taken by condemnation by the municipality and all property that will in some manner be injured by the improvements to be constructed within the district, together with the valuations set on each such property or the damages to the property by the injuries to be inflicted. Such schedule of property shall be made public simultaneously with the assessment roll and for a like period of time.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 22; T.C.A., § 6-3922.

7-84-409. Assessment roll and schedule of damages — Filing — Open to public — Hearings on assessments and damages — Notice.

Such assessment roll and such schedule of damages shall be filed with the governing body of the municipality, which shall open such roll and such schedule to the public for a period of not less than ten (10) days.

The governing body of the municipality shall set a date for a public hearing on the assessments and damages and shall publish a notice of such public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation within the municipality, and shall also mail a copy of the notice to each property owner in the district as provided in § 7-84-304. The notice shall set out:

A summary of the ordinance creating the central business improvement district;

The fact that the assessments to pay for the improvements within such districts have been prepared and are on public display, setting forth the dates and times when they may be examined;

The fact that damages have been set on all properties to be taken by the municipality and on all property in some manner to be injured by the proposed improvements;

Notice that an ordinance adopting such assessments and such damages will be passed on final reading seven (7) days following the conclusion of the public hearing; and

Notice of the date, time, and place of public hearing and that all objections to the amount of the assessments levied or the damages awarded will be heard at such public hearing.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 23; T.C.A., § 6-3923.

7-84-410. Hearing — Board of review — Board representation by attorney.

The governing body of the municipality shall, at the public hearing, sit as a board of review with respect to all assessments levied. The governing body shall appoint an attorney to represent the board of assessment commissioners in such hearings, and the compensation of such attorney shall be a cost of the central business improvement district.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 24; T.C.A., § 6-3924.

7-84-411. Objections to amount of assessment or damages.

Any person whose property is proposed to be taken, interfered with, injured, or assessed for benefits under any of the provisions of this chapter, who is dissatisfied with the amount of damages awarded to such person for the taking of or interference with such person's property, with the valuation set on such person's property to be condemned, or with the amount of the assessment or benefits to any property affected by the proceedings, shall appear at the hearing or file with the governing body, at any time before the hearing, such person's objections to the damages awarded or benefits assessed.

Any such person may appear at the hearing, in person or by attorney, and the governing body shall then consider the assessment roll and the schedule of damages and hear the objectors, or their representatives, and shall adjourn the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 25; T.C.A., § 6-3925.

7-84-412. Decisions on assessments and damages — Ordinances — Review.

The governing body shall then consider the assessments and the damages awarded and may amend or affirm the assessments and damages and shall adopt an ordinance incorporating such assessments as amended and shall by separate ordinance confirm the award of damages as amended, as the governing body shall see fit.

Such assessment shall be final and conclusive upon all parties interested, and may be reviewed only as provided by title 27, chapter 9, except that the petition referred to in § 27-9-102 shall be filed within thirty (30) days from the date of passage of such ordinance.

Persons whose property is to be taken, or to whom damages are to be awarded for a partial taking or an injury to their property, in addition to the rights accorded by title 29, chapter 17, may, in the event proceedings are not initiated by the municipality, sue for damages in the ordinary way, in which case proceedings may be had, as near as may be, as provided in title 29, chapter 17.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 26; 1974, ch. 428, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3926.

7-84-413. Levy and payment of assessments — Interest — Installments.

The assessment on each property shall be levied at one (1) time in the ordinance provided for in § 7-84-412. The governing body may provide in such ordinance levying the assessment that all or such portion of the assessment as is designated in the ordinance may be paid in equal installments over a period of time, not exceeding thirty (30) years from the effective date of the ordinance levying the installment.

Installments may be payable at least annually, but may be payable at more frequent intervals, as provided by the ordinance levying the assessment, and the governing body shall determine the method of collection.

Where the assessment is payable in installments, the ordinance may provide that the unpaid balance of the assessment, from time to time, shall bear interest at a rate or rates not in excess of ten percent (10%) per annum from the effective date of such ordinance or from such other date as may be specified in the ordinance, until due. Interest may be paid in addition to the amount of each installment annually, or at more frequent intervals, as provided in the ordinance levying the assessment.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 27; T.C.A., § 6-3927; Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 14 provided that the act shall apply to central business improvement districts already in existence and any districts that hereinafter may be created.

Cross-References. Delinquent interest rate, §7-84-415.

Penalty for late payment of assessment or installment, §7-84-418.

7-84-414. Prepayment.

Assessments payable in installments may be paid prior to the due date of any such installment.

The whole or any part of the assessment may be paid without interest within sixty (60) days after the ordinance levying the assessment becomes effective. If the assessment is paid in part, the unpaid balance shall be payable in substantially equal installments over the period of time installments are payable as provided in the assessment ordinance.

After such sixty-day period and if the ordinance levying the assessment so provides, all unpaid installments of assessments levied against any piece of property, but only in their entirety, may be paid prior to the dates on which they become due, but any such prepayment must include an additional amount equal to the interest that would accrue on the assessment to the next succeeding date on which interest is payable on any special improvement bonds issued in anticipation of the collection of the assessment, plus such additional amount as, in the opinion of the governing body of the municipality, is necessary to assure the availability of money to pay interest on the special improvement bonds as interest becomes due, and any premiums that may become payable on redeemable bonds that may be called in order to utilize the assessment thus paid in advance.

The municipality may allow, in its discretion, discounts for prepayment of assessments, or installments of assessments; provided, that such discounts do not impair the ability of the municipality fully to fund the bonds issued in pursuance of the authority granted by this chapter.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 28; T.C.A., § 6-3928.

7-84-415. Default in payment of installments.

When an assessment is payable in installments, default in the payment of any installment of principal or interest when due shall cause the whole of the unpaid principal and interest to become due and payable immediately, and the whole amount of the unpaid principal shall thereafter draw interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum until paid; but, at any time prior to the date of sale in proceedings to enforce the lien of the delinquent assessments, the owner may pay the amount of all unpaid installments past due, with interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum to date of payment on the delinquent installments, and all proper costs, and shall thereupon be restored to the right thereafter to pay in installments in the same manner as if default had not occurred.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 29; T.C.A., § 6-3929.

Cross-References. Penalty for late payment of assessment or installment, §7-84-418.

7-84-416. Lien on property affected.

An assessment, any interest accruing on the assessment, and the costs of collection of the assessment shall constitute a lien on and against the property upon which the assessment is levied on the effective date of the ordinance levying the assessment, which lien shall be superior to the lien of any trust deed, mortgage, mechanic's or material supplier's lien, or other encumbrance, except those of the state, county, or municipality for taxes. Such lien shall, however, survive any sale of the property for or on account of any unpaid taxes, and may be enforced by attachment and sale in bar of the equity of redemption, except as provided in §7-84-417, in the chancery court or in any other lawful manner.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 30; T.C.A., § 6-3930.

7-84-417. Redemption from municipality after foreclosure of lien.

In case any assessment is or becomes delinquent and the property subject to the delinquency has been or is to be sold to the municipality for the delinquency, redemption of such property shall be permitted upon payment, not later than six (6) months after the date of sale, of the full amount due plus interest, any taxes paid by the municipality, and accrued costs and redemption fees as may be prescribed by ordinance of the municipality, unless, in the judgment of the governing body of the municipality, the interest of the municipality shall be subserved by accepting a less sum in settlement for the delinquency.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 31; T.C.A., § 6-3931.

7-84-418. Penalty for late payment of assessment or installment.

In case of failure to pay any assessment, or installment, on or before the date prescribed by the governing body for such payment, there shall be added to the assessment a penalty of one half of one percent (0.5%) per month of the amount of such assessment or installment.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 32; T.C.A., § 6-3932.

Cross-References. Delinquent interest rate, §7-84-415.

7-84-419. Separate fund.

All money paid to the municipality in payment of the central business improvement district assessments and interest on the assessments shall be deemed to be a part of and constitute a separate fund for the payment of the cost and expenses of making the improvements in the district, for the payment of interim warrants and special improvement bonds with interest on the bonds issued against the central business improvement district created to make the improvements, and for no other purposes. The fund so created shall be held in the custody of the treasurer or other official of the municipality, kept intact and separate from all other funds and moneys of the municipality and shall be paid out only for the purposes specified in this chapter and as provided in the ordinance creating the central business improvement district. Such fund may be invested by the municipality in the same manner and under the same laws as provided for the investment of other public funds.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 33; T.C.A., § 6-3933.

7-84-420. When assessments made — Refunds — Increases.

Assessments shall be made by the board of assessment commissioners prior to the acquisition of an improvement or commencement of the construction of an improvement described in the ordinance organizing the central business improvement district or upon the completion of the improvements, at the discretion of the board of assessment commissioners. In the event, however, that such assessments prove ultimately to be in excess of the total cost, the surplus of assessments may be rebated to the owners of the property assessed. The amount to be rebated to each property owner shall be the proportion of the total rebate that the amount of the property owner's assessment bears to the total amount of all assessments originally levied. The rebate may be applied as a prepayment of any unpaid amount of the assessment and any balance shall be paid to the owner at the time the rebate is made of the property assessed. In the event that the totality of the assessment ultimately proves to be less than the total cost of all the improvements in the central business improvement district, the municipality shall be authorized to increase the assessment on each property by an amount equal to the percentage that the original assessment on each property bears to the total assessment, multiplied by the total additional assessment required of the district.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 34; T.C.A., § 6-3934; Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 14 provided that the act shall apply to central business improvement districts already in existence and any districts that hereinafter may be created.

Cross-References. Costs determined upon completion of work, §7-84-402.